Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Subarticle F. Transition Provisions

§ 17-17-150.
Application to existing corporations.

This chapter applies to all corporations electing statutory close corporation status under W.S.

17-17-103

after its effective date.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 201, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

As to the effective date of this chapter (i.e., Laws 1989, ch. 201), referred to in this section, see “Revision of title” note following title 17 heading.

§ 17-17-151.
Reservation of power to amend or repeal.

The legislature has power to amend or repeal all or part of this chapter at any time and all corporations subject to this chapter are governed by the amendment or repeal.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 201, § 1.